North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-34 Transportation Company Networks

39-34-01.
Agent.

The transportation network company must maintain a registered agent with the secretary of state for service of process in this state.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 223, § 2, effective April 22, 2015.

Effective Date.

This chapter became effective April 22, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 3 of chapter 223, S.L. 2015.

39-34-02.
Fare charged for services.

The transportation network company shall provide passengers with the applicable rates being charged and the option to receive an estimated fare before the passenger enters the transportation network company driver’s vehicle.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 223, § 2, effective April 22, 2015.

39-34-03.
Transportation driver requirements.

Before permitting an individual to act as a transportation network company driver on its digital platform, the transportation network company shall:

Require the individual to submit an application to the transportation network company, which includes information regarding the individual’s address, age, driver’s license, driving history, motor vehicle registration, automobile liability insurance, and other information required by the transportation network company;

Conduct, or have a third party conduct, a local and national criminal background check for each applicant that must include:

Multistate and multijurisdiction criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation; and

National sex offender registry database; and

Obtain and review a driving history research report for the individual.

The transportation network company may not permit an individual to act as a transportation network company driver on its digital platform who:

Has had more than three moving violations in the prior three-year period, or one major violation in the prior three-year period, including attempting to evade the police, reckless driving, or driving on a suspended or revoked license;

Has been convicted, within the past seven years, of driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, fraud, a sexual offense, use of a motor vehicle to commit a felony, a crime involving property damage, theft, an act of violence, or an act of terror;

Is a match in the national sex offender registry database;

Does not possess a valid driver’s license;

Does not possess proof of registration for the motor vehicle used to provide transportation network company services;

Does not possess proof of automobile liability insurance for the motor vehicle used to provide transportation network company services; or

Is not at least twenty-one years of age.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 223, § 2, effective April 22, 2015.

39-34-04.
Personally identifiable information.

A transportation network company may not disclose any personally identifiable information of a transportation network company passenger, except pursuant to the publicly disclosed terms of the transportation network company’s privacy policy. For any other disclosure not governed by the privacy policy, the transportation network company must obtain the passenger’s consent before the company may disclose the passenger’s personally identifiable information.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 223, § 2, effective April 22, 2015.

39-34-05.
Transportation network company reporting requirements — Legislative management report — Penalty.
[Repealed]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 223, § 2, effective April 22, 2015; repealed by 2021, ch. 301, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

39-34-06.
Controlling authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, transportation network companies and transportation network company drivers are governed exclusively by this chapter, chapter 26.1-40.1, and any rules adopted consistent with this chapter and adopted by the insurance commissioner under chapter 26.1-40.1.

A political subdivision may not impose a tax on, or require a license for, a transportation network company or a transportation network company driver or subject a transportation network company to the political subdivision’s rate, entry, operational, or other requirements.

This chapter may not be construed to limit the ability of a commercial service airport or the governing body of a commercial service airport to enter an operating agreement with a transportation network company which authorizes operational access to the commercial service airport. An operating agreement entered under this subsection may provide guidelines for entry, pick-up, drop-off, fees, and other airport operational procedures required by the commercial service airport for the transportation network company to be allowed operational access to the commercial service airport. As used in this subsection, “commercial service airport” means a public airport that has at least two thousand five hundred passenger boardings per calendar year and receives scheduled passenger aircraft service.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 223, § 2, effective April 22, 2015; 2017, ch. 276, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 302, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.